Wisconsin, session 2025, SB361.
do enact as follows:SB361,11Section 1. 5.02 (16m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,2,425.02 (16m) “Recognized political party” means a political party which that 3qualifies for a separate ballot or column or row on partisan primary and election 4ballots under s. 5.62 (1) (b) or (2).SB361,25Section 2. 5.35 (6) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB361,36Section 3. 5.37 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 5.37 (4) (intro.) and 7amended to read:SB361,2,985.37 (4) (intro.) Voting machines may be used at primary elections when they 9comply with subs. (1) and (2) and the following provisions: All candidates’ names SB361,2,1410(a) Each candidate’s name entitled to appear on the ballots ballot at the 11primary and the party that he or she represents shall appear on the machine; the 12elector cannot vote for candidates of more than one party, whenever the restriction 13applies; the elector may secretly select the party for which he or she wishes to vote; 14the.SB361,2,1615(b) The elector may vote for as many candidates for each office as he or she is 16lawfully entitled to vote for, but no more.SB361,417Section 4. 5.51 (7) of the statutes is repealed.SB361,51Section 5. 5.62 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,3,2125.62 (1) (a) At the partisan primary, the following ballot shall be provided for 3the nomination of candidates of recognized political parties for national, state and 4county offices and independent candidates for state office in each ward, in the same 5form as prescribed by the commission under s. 7.08 (1) (a), except as authorized in s. 65.655. The ballots ballot shall be made up of the several party tickets with each 7party entitled to participate in the primary under par. (b) or sub. (2) having its own 8ballot column or row, except as authorized in s. 5.655. The ballots shall be secured 9together at the bottom. The party ballot column or row of the party receiving the 10most votes for president or governor at the last general election shall be on top first 11with the other parties arranged in descending order based on their vote for 12president or governor at the last general election. The ballots columns or rows of 13parties qualifying under sub. (2) shall be placed after to the right of or below the 14parties qualifying under par. (b), in the same order in which the parties filed 15petitions with the commission. Any ballot required under par. (b) 2. shall be placed 16next in order. At polling places where voting machines are used, each party shall be 17represented in one or more separate columns or rows on the ballot. At polling 18places where an electronic voting system is used other than an electronic voting 19machine, each party may be represented in separate columns or rows on the ballot. 20An elector at the partisan primary may vote for any candidate for each office 21regardless of the political affiliation of the candidate.SB361,4,1322(b) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2. and s. 5.64 (1) (e) 2., every recognized 23political party listed on the official ballot at the last gubernatorial election whose 24candidate for any statewide office received at least 1 percent of the total votes cast 1for that office and, if the last general election was also a presidential election, every 2recognized political party listed on the ballot at that election whose candidate for 3president received at least 1 percent of the total vote votes cast for that office shall 4have a separate primary ballot or one or more separate columns or rows on the 5primary ballot as prescribed in par. (a) and a separate column on the general 6election ballot at the partisan primary and general election in every ward and 7election district. An organization which that was listed as “independent” at the last 8general election and whose candidate meets the same qualification shall receive the 9same ballot status upon petition of to the commission by the chairperson and 10secretary of the organization to the commission requesting such status and 11specifying their party name, which may not duplicate the name of an existing party. 12A petition under this subdivision may be filed no later than 5 p.m. on April 1 in the 13year of each general election.SB361,5,3142. Subdivision 1. applies to a party within any assembly district or county at 15any partisan primary election only if at least one candidate of the party for any 16national, state or county office qualifies to have his or her name appear on the 17ballot under the name of that party within that assembly district or county. The 18county clerk or county board of election commissioners shall provide a combined 19separate ballot or one or more separate columns or rows on the ballot that will 20permit an elector to cast a vote for a write-in candidate for the nomination of any 21such party for each national, state, and county office whenever that party qualifies 22to be represented on a separate primary ballot or in one or more separate columns 23or rows under subd. 1. but does not qualify under this subdivision. The ballot shall 24include the name of each party qualifying for a separate ballot or one or more 1separate columns or rows on the ballot under each office, with the names of the 2candidates for each such party appearing in the same order in which the ballots 3columns or rows of the parties would appear under par. (a).SB361,64Section 6. 5.62 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,5,1955.62 (2) (a) Except as provided in par. (b) and s. 5.64 (1) (e) 2., any political 6organization may be represented on a separate primary ballot or in one or more 7separate columns or rows on the partisan primary ballot as prescribed in sub. (1) (a) 8and in a separate column or row on the general election ballot in every ward and 9election district. To qualify for a separate ballot column or row under this 10paragraph, the political organization shall, not later than 5 p.m. on April 1 in the 11year of the partisan primary, file with the commission a petition requesting 12separate ballot status column or row on the partisan primary ballot. The petition 13shall be signed by at least 10,000 electors, including at least 1,000 electors residing 14in each of at least 3 separate congressional districts. The petition shall conform to 15the requirements of s. 8.40. No signature obtained before January 1 in the year of 16filing is valid. When the candidates of a political organization filing a valid petition 17fulfill the requirements prescribed by law, they shall appear on a separate ballot or 18in one or more separate columns or rows on the ballot for the period ending with the 19following general election.SB361,6,920(b) Paragraph (a) applies to a party within any assembly district or county at 21any partisan primary election only if at least one candidate of the party for any 22national, state, or county office qualifies to have his or her name appear on the 23ballot under the name of that party within that assembly district or county. The 24county clerk or county board of election commissioners shall provide a combined 1separate ballot or or one or more separate columns or rows on the ballot that will 2permit an elector to cast a vote for a write-in candidate for the nomination of any 3such party for each national, state, and county office whenever that party qualifies 4to be represented on a separate primary ballot or in one or more separate columns 5or rows under par. (a) but does not qualify under this paragraph. The ballot shall 6include the name of each party qualifying for a separate ballot or one or more 7separate columns or rows on the ballot under each office, with the names of the 8candidates for each such party appearing in the same order in which the ballots 9columns or rows of the parties would appear under sub. (1) (a).SB361,710Section 7. 5.62 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,6,19115.62 (3) The commission shall designate the official primary ballot 12arrangement for statewide offices and district attorney within each prosecutorial 13district by using the same procedure as provided in s. 5.60 (1) (b). On each ballot 14and on each separate column or row on the ballot, the candidates for office shall be 15listed together with the offices which that they seek in the following order whenever 16these offices appear on the partisan primary ballot: governor, lieutenant governor, 17attorney general, secretary of state, state treasurer, U.S. senator, U.S. 18representative in congress, state senator, representative to the assembly, district 19attorney, and the county offices.SB361,820Section 8. 5.655 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,7,4215.655 (1) Whenever a separate ballot is required to be used, a municipality 22may use a single ballot to facilitate the use of voting machines or an electronic 23voting system or, if the municipality employs paper ballots, may use a consolidated 24paper ballot that is authorized under sub. (2). If a municipality uses a single ballot 1in lieu of separate ballots, the ballot shall include a separate column or row for any 2office, or referendum or party for which a separate ballot is required by law and the 3ballot shall be distributed only to electors who are eligible to vote for all of the 4offices and referenda appearing on the ballot.SB361,95Section 9. 5.81 (4) of the statutes is repealed.SB361,106Section 10. 5.84 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,8,275.84 (1) Where any municipality employs an electronic voting system which 8utilizes automatic tabulating equipment, either at the polling place or at a central 9counting location, the municipal clerk shall, on any day not more than 10 days prior 10to the election day on which the equipment is to be utilized, have the equipment 11tested to ascertain that it will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all 12measures. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be given by the clerk 13at least 48 hours prior to the test by publication of a class 1 notice under ch. 985 in 14one or more newspapers published within the municipality if a newspaper is 15published therein, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation therein. The 16test shall be open to the public. The test shall be conducted by processing a 17preaudited group of ballots so marked as to record a predetermined number of valid 18votes for each candidate and on each referendum. The test shall include for each 19office one or more ballots which that have votes in excess of the number allowed by 20law and, for a partisan primary election, one or more ballots which have votes cast 21for candidates of more than one recognized political party, in order to test the ability 22of the automatic tabulating equipment to reject such votes. If any error is detected, 23the municipal clerk shall ascertain the cause and correct the error. The clerk shall 1make an errorless count before the automatic tabulating equipment is approved by 2the clerk for use in the election.SB361,113Section 11. 5.91 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,8,545.91 (1) It enables an elector to vote in secrecy and to select the party for 5which an elector will vote in secrecy at a partisan primary election.SB361,126Section 12. 5.91 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,8,1175.91 (3) Except in primary elections, it It enables an elector to vote for a ticket 8selected in part from the nominees of one party, and in part from the nominees of 9other parties, and in part from independent candidates and, except in the case of 10independent candidates at primary elections, in part of from candidates whose 11names are written in by the elector.SB361,1312Section 13. 5.91 (6) of the statutes is repealed.SB361,1413Section 14. 6.80 (2) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,8,19146.80 (2) (am) In partisan primaries, an elector may vote for a person as the 15candidate of the party of the elector’s choice, if that person’s name does not appear 16on the official ballot of that party, by writing in the name of the person in the space 17provided on the ballot or the ballot provided for that purpose, or where voting 18machines are used, in the irregular ballot device, designating the party for which 19the elector desires such person to be the nominee.SB361,1520Section 15. 6.80 (2) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,9,9216.80 (2) (f) In the presidential preference primary and other partisan primary 22elections at polling places where ballots are distributed to electors, unless the 23ballots are prepared under s. 5.655 or are utilized with an electronic voting system 24in which all candidates appear on the same ballot, after the elector prepares his or 1her ballot the elector shall detach the remaining ballots, fold the ballots to be 2discarded and fold the completed ballot unless the ballot is intended for counting 3with automatic tabulating equipment. The elector shall then either personally 4deposit the ballots to be discarded into the separate ballot box marked “blank ballot 5box,” and deposit the completed ballot into the ballot box indicated by the 6inspectors, or give the ballots to an inspector who shall deposit the ballots directly 7into the appropriate ballot boxes. The inspectors shall keep the blank ballot box 8locked until the canvass is completed and shall dispose of the blank ballots as 9prescribed by the municipal clerk.SB361,1610Section 16. 6.87 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,9,24116.87 (4) (b) 1. Except as otherwise provided in s. 6.875, an elector voting 12absentee, other than a military elector or an overseas elector, shall make and 13subscribe to the certification before one witness who is an adult U.S. citizen. A 14military elector or an overseas elector voting absentee, regardless of whether the 15elector qualifies as a resident of this state under s. 6.10, shall make and subscribe 16to the certification before one witness who is an adult but who need not be a U.S. 17citizen. The absent elector, in the presence of the witness, shall mark the ballot in 18a manner that will not disclose how the elector’s vote is cast. The elector shall then, 19still in the presence of the witness, fold the ballots so each is separate and so that 20the elector conceals the markings thereon and deposit them in the proper envelope. 21If a consolidated ballot under s. 5.655 is used, the elector shall fold the ballot so that 22the elector conceals the markings thereon and deposit the ballot in the proper 23envelope. If proof of residence under s. 6.34 is required and the document enclosed 24by the elector under this subdivision does not constitute proof of residence under s. 16.34, the elector shall also enclose proof of residence under s. 6.34 in the envelope. 2Except as provided in s. 6.34 (2m), proof of residence is required if the elector is not 3a military elector or an overseas elector and the elector registered by mail or by 4electronic application and has not voted in an election in this state. If the elector 5requested a ballot by means of facsimile transmission or electronic mail under s. 66.86 (1) (ac), the elector shall enclose in the envelope a copy of the request which 7bears an original signature of the elector. The elector may receive assistance under 8sub. (5). The return envelope shall then be sealed. The witness may not be a 9candidate. The envelope shall be mailed by the elector, or delivered in person, to the 10municipal clerk issuing the ballot or ballots. If the envelope is mailed from a 11location outside the United States, the elector shall affix sufficient postage unless 12the ballot qualifies for delivery free of postage under federal law. Failure to return 13an unused ballot in a primary does not invalidate the ballot on which the elector’s 14votes are cast. Return of more than one marked ballot in a primary or return of a 15ballot prepared under s. 5.655 or a ballot used with an electronic voting system in a 16primary which is marked for candidates of more than one party invalidates all votes 17cast by the elector for candidates in the primary.SB361,1718Section 17. 7.08 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,10,23197.08 (2) (b) The certified list of candidates for president and vice president 20who have been nominated at a national convention by a party entitled to a separate 21column or row on the partisan primary ballot or for whom electors have been 22nominated under s. 8.20 shall be sent as soon as possible after the closing date for 23filing nomination papers, but no later than the deadlines established in s. 10.06.SB361,1824Section 18. 7.50 (1) (d) of the statutes is repealed.SB361,191Section 19. 7.50 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,11,427.50 (2) (g) In partisan primaries, if an elector writes in the name of an 3individual on a ballot in a column or row other than the one on which that 4individual’s name is shown as a candidate, the write-in vote may not be counted.SB361,205Section 20. 8.16 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,11,1068.16 (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), the person who receives the greatest 7number of votes for an office on a party ballot at any partisan primary, regardless of 8whether the person’s name appears on the ballot, shall be the party’s candidate for 9the office, and the person’s name shall so appear on the official ballot at the next 10election.SB361,2111Section 21. 8.16 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB361,11,15128.16 (6) The persons who receive the greatest number of votes respectively for 13the offices of governor and lieutenant governor on for any party ballot at a primary 14shall be the party’s joint candidates for the offices, and their names shall so appear 15on the official ballot at the next election.SB361,2216Section 22. 8.16 (7) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb361 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb361 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB361 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB361 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB361: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting